Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1434
Landlord liens; distraint of property; prohibited.

(1) A lien or security interest on behalf of the landlord in the tenant's household goods is not enforceable.

(2) Distraint for rent is abolished.

Laws 1974, LB 293, § 34.